North Dakota statutes. TITLE 12 Corrections, Parole, and Probation
CHAPTER 12-44.1 Jails and Regional Correction Centers
12-44.1-28.
Correctional facility files and records confidentiality. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The medical, psychological, and treatment records of an inmate are confidential and may not be disclosed directly or indirectly to any person, organization, or agency, except as provided in this section. A court may order the inspection of the records, or parts of the records, upon an application to the court and a showing that there is a proper and legitimate purpose for the inspection and the provision of written authorization from the inmate for the inspection. Notwithstanding any other provision of law relating to privilege or confidentiality, except for the confidentiality requirements of federal drug and alcohol treatment and rehabilitation laws, medical, psychological, or treatment records may be inspected by or disclosed to the following persons, organizations, or agencies without prior authorization from the inmate or an order from the court:

A criminal justice agency as defined in subsection 4 of section 44-04-18.7.

A division, department, official, or employee of the department of corrections and rehabilitation.

A federal, state, regional, county, or municipal correctional facility receiving physical custody of an inmate from the original correctional facility.

A municipal or district court.

The department of human services, a public hospital or treatment facility, or a licensed private hospital or treatment facility.

A person, agency, or institution governed by statutory confidentiality requirements and receiving information or records under this section shall maintain the confidentiality requirements.

Except as provided in subdivision a, a person, organization, or agency receiving confidential records under subsection 1 may not redisclose the records and must maintain the confidentiality of the records.

The employment or work release status of an inmate is an open record.

Records with respect to inmate identification, charges, criminal convictions, bail information, and intake and projected release dates are open records.

Records with respect to a sentenced inmate’s institutional discipline and conduct and protective management are exempt records as defined under section 44-04-17.1.

Institutional discipline and conduct and protective management records of all other inmates are confidential records and may only be disclosed as provided in subsection 1.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 125, § 1.

12-44.1-28.
Correctional facility files and records confidentiality. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The medical, psychological, and treatment records of an inmate are confidential and may not be disclosed directly or indirectly to any person, organization, or agency, except as provided in this section. A court may order the inspection of the records, or parts of the records, upon an application to the court and a showing that there is a proper and legitimate purpose for the inspection and the provision of written authorization from the inmate for the inspection. Notwithstanding any other provision of law relating to privilege or confidentiality, except for the confidentiality requirements of federal drug and alcohol treatment and rehabilitation laws, medical, psychological, or treatment records may be inspected by or disclosed to the following persons, organizations, or agencies without prior authorization from the inmate or an order from the court:

A criminal justice agency as defined in subsection 4 of section 44-04-18.7.

A division, department, official, or employee of the department of corrections and rehabilitation.

A federal, state, regional, county, or municipal correctional facility receiving physical custody of an inmate from the original correctional facility.

A municipal or district court.

The department of health and human services, a public hospital or treatment facility, or a licensed private hospital or treatment facility.

A person, agency, or institution governed by statutory confidentiality requirements and receiving information or records under this section shall maintain the confidentiality requirements.

Except as provided in subdivision a, a person, organization, or agency receiving confidential records under subsection 1 may not redisclose the records and must maintain the confidentiality of the records.

The employment or work release status of an inmate is an open record.

Records with respect to inmate identification, charges, criminal convictions, bail information, and intake and projected release dates are open records.

Records with respect to a sentenced inmate’s institutional discipline and conduct and protective management are exempt records as defined under section 44-04-17.1.

Institutional discipline and conduct and protective management records of all other inmates are confidential records and may only be disclosed as provided in subsection 1.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 125, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 14, effective September 1, 2022.

12-44.1-29.
Provision of medication — Training requirements — Verification — Rules. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

A correctional facility may authorize an employee to provide medication to an inmate of a correctional facility if the employee is:

Licensed or registered under title 43 and is providing the medication within the scope of practice of the profession for which the individual is licensed or registered; or

A correctional facility staff member who has successfully completed a medication assistant I training and competency evaluation program approved by the state department of health under chapter 23-44. The requirements for a medication assistant I training and competency evaluation program must be met, except for the requirement a correctional facility staff member must be a nurse aide or certified nurse aide on the department registry prior to entry into the medication assistant I training and competency evaluation program or following successful completion of the program.

If a correctional facility uses a correctional facility staff member to provide medication to an inmate under subdivision b of subsection 1:

Upon successful completion of the department-approved medication assistant I training and competency evaluation program, the correctional facility staff member may provide medication administration to inmates consistent within the scope and limitations of medication administration included in the medication assistant I training and competency evaluation program; and

The correctional facility shall maintain records of all correctional facility staff members who have successfully completed the department-approved medication assistant I training and competency evaluation program, including verification of successful completion of the program. The department may periodically review the correctional facility’s records to assure compliance with medication assistant I training and competency evaluation requirements.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 112, § 1; 2013, ch. 98, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 98, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

12-44.1-29.
Provision of medication — Training requirements — Verification — Rules. [Effective September 1, 2022]

A correctional facility may authorize an employee to provide medication to an inmate of a correctional facility if the employee is:

Licensed or registered under title 43 and is providing the medication within the scope of practice of the profession for which the individual is licensed or registered; or

A correctional facility staff member who has successfully completed a medication assistant I training and competency evaluation program approved by the department of health and human services under chapter 23-44. The requirements for a medication assistant I training and competency evaluation program must be met, except for the requirement a correctional facility staff member must be a nurse aide or certified nurse aide on the department registry prior to entry into the medication assistant I training and competency evaluation program or following successful completion of the program.

If a correctional facility uses a correctional facility staff member to provide medication to an inmate under subdivision b of subsection 1:

Upon successful completion of the department-approved medication assistant I training and competency evaluation program, the correctional facility staff member may provide medication administration to inmates consistent within the scope and limitations of medication administration included in the medication assistant I training and competency evaluation program; and

The correctional facility shall maintain records of all correctional facility staff members who have successfully completed the department-approved medication assistant I training and competency evaluation program, including verification of successful completion of the program. The department may periodically review the correctional facility’s records to assure compliance with medication assistant I training and competency evaluation requirements.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 112, § 1; 2013, ch. 98, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 15, effective September 1, 2022.

12-44.1-30.
Correctional officers authorized to carry weapons.

The administrator of a correctional facility may allow a qualified correctional officer to carry a weapon, including a firearm, during the transport of another governmental agency’s prisoner if the correctional facility has a contract with the governmental agency to transport the agency’s prisoners and that contract requires the officer doing the transport to be armed with a weapon. For purposes of this section, “governmental agency” means an agency or department of this state or of any political subdivision in this state, or another state or of a political subdivision of another state, or of the United States. The administrator of a correctional facility shall adopt a policy, approved by the director of the department of corrections and rehabilitation, which establishes the qualifications and training an officer must meet to carry a weapon under this section. Sections 62.1-02-05, 62.1-02-10, and 62.1-03-01 do not apply to the possession and use of a firearm by a qualified correctional officer acting in the course of employment as allowed by this section.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 117, § 1.

12-44.1-31.
Contracts for out-of-state inmates — Requirements.

The governing body of a correctional facility that contracts with another state or a regional correctional center, county, or city of another state for the confinement of lawfully committed state, county, or city inmates from the other state is subject to the following conditions:

Before a correctional facility may accept an out-of-state inmate, the governing body of the correctional facility shall approve and sign the contract that authorizes housing out-of-state inmates.

Before accepting an out-of-state inmate, the administrator of the correctional facility shall review the out-of-state inmate’s file and request a nationwide criminal history background check. The administrator may not accept:

Any inmate with a history of escape or attempted escape from official detention as defined under section 12.1-08-06 or under an equivalent federal statute or statute of another state;

Any inmate with a history of institutional violence, including violence against staff or other inmates;

Any inmate who has pled guilty to, or has been convicted of, a crime of violence. For the purpose of this section, a crime of violence includes kidnapping and any violation of any state or federal law when the inmate knowingly or intentionally inflicted, attempted to inflict, or threatened serious bodily injury, or death, or when the inmate was armed with a firearm, dangerous weapon, or destructive device;

An inmate who has been convicted of aggravated assault involving substantial or serious bodily injury, and the offense is a felony under the laws of the sending state or under federal law, unless the administrator has obtained the approval of the department of corrections and rehabilitation in advance of the placement. The state of North Dakota and any officer or employee of the department is immune from any civil liability for damages for personal injury or property damage caused by an inmate placed in a correctional facility under this subsection;

Any inmate who has pled guilty to, or has been convicted of, a sexual offense in which the victim was a child under the age of fifteen years, or the inmate compelled, or attempted to compel, the victim to submit by force or by threat of imminent death, serious bodily injury, or kidnapping, or if in the course of the offense, the inmate inflicted serious or substantial bodily injury on the victim; or

Any inmate who has a documented affiliation as a member of a criminal street gang as defined under section 12.1-06.2-01 or equivalent statute of another state or under federal law.

Out-of-state inmates may not be permitted to leave the premises of the correctional facility except to comply with a court order or to receive medical care.

The correctional facility may not house out-of-state inmates in the same cells with inmates of the department of corrections and rehabilitation.

A contract under this section must include a requirement that if an out-of-state inmate is charged with committing a crime while in the custody of the correctional facility, the sending state shall take custody of the inmate upon the request of the correctional facility and the written consent of the state’s attorney of the county where the correctional facility is located. If the sending state takes custody of the inmate and the state’s attorney requests the inmate be returned to this state for prosecution, the correctional facility is responsible for the cost of returning the inmate to this state for prosecution. If an out-of-state inmate is convicted and sentenced to the legal and physical custody of the department of corrections and rehabilitation for a crime committed while in the custody of the correctional facility, the correctional facility shall reimburse the department for its costs to confine the inmate until completion of the term of imprisonment.

The department of corrections and rehabilitation may not assume custody of an out-of-state inmate placed in a correctional facility in this state under a contract between the governing body of a correctional facility and a sending state except under a lawful sentence and judgment of a district court of this state and after notice to the sending state.

If the state or a political subdivision of this state incurs any cost in the investigation or prosecution of an offense committed by an out-of-state inmate while in the custody of a contracting correctional facility, the correctional facility shall reimburse the state or political subdivision for the costs incurred.

A contract under this section must include a requirement that the sending state shall notify the correctional facility of the expiration date of the out-of-state inmate’s imprisonment when the sending state transfers the out-of-state inmate to the correctional facility and that the sending state shall retake the out-of-state inmate before the expiration date of the out-of-state inmate’s imprisonment.

For purposes of this section, “out-of-state inmate” means an individual who is convicted of a crime in a state other than North Dakota; “sending state” means another state and includes a city, county, or regional correctional center of another state; and “correctional facility” means a facility subject to this chapter.

The correctional facility shall defend, indemnify, and hold harmless the state of North Dakota, its agencies, officers, and employees from and against claims for personal injury or property damage caused by an out-of-state inmate placed in a correctional facility under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

12-44.1-32.
Sentence reduction credit.

An inmate sentenced to a correctional facility under this chapter is eligible to earn sentence reductions based upon criteria established by the administrator, including sentence reduction for good conduct. While incarcerated in a correctional facility, an offender may earn no more than a one-day sentence reduction per six days served.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 93, § 1; 2017, ch. 108, § 1, effective April 21, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 93, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

12-44.1-33.
Inmate medical care costs.

An inmate is financially responsible for the costs of medical or health care, except for an intake health care assessment and related testing for an examination of the inmate made at the request of the facility. The correctional facility may seek reimbursement from the inmate up to the total amount of incurred medical or health care costs. If the inmate has health insurance coverage, a medical or health care provider shall file a claim for reimbursement from the health insurance provider. If the inmate does not have health insurance coverage and the inmate’s medical or health care costs are the responsibility of the correctional facility, the correctional facility’s responsibility may not exceed the rates paid under the federal Medicare program. If elective medical or health care is allowed by a correctional facility policy, the inmate must arrange payment for elective medical or health care before receiving care.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 91, § 3.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2011.

Cross-References.

Inmate accounts, see N.D.C.C. § 12-44.1-12.1.

Rights to adequate medical care, see N.D.C.C. § 12-44.1-14.

Collateral References.

Provision of hormone therapy or sexual reassignment surgery to state inmates with Gender Identity Disorder (GID), 89 A.L.R.6th 701.